Tennessee, session 114, SB1405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1357(a), is amended by
deleting "sixty (60) days" and substituting "ninety (90) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1405
003354
- 1 -